fr: Diamètre maximal de bobine pris en charge: 10,5 pouces; 12 pouces; 14 pouces; 5 pouces; 7 pouces; Autre
el: Μέγιστη υποστηριζόμενη διάμετρος καρουλιού: 10,5 ίντσες; 12 ίντσες; 14 ίντσες; 5 ίντσες; 7 ίντσες; Άλλο
ko: 지원 최대 릴 직경: 10.5인치; 12인치; 14인치; 5인치; 7인치; 기타
sv: Maximal spoldiameter som stöds: 10,5 tum; 12 tum; 14 tum; 5 tum; 7 tum; Övrigt
fi: Suurin tuettu kelan halkaisija: 10,5 tuumaa; 12 tuumaa; 14 tuumaa; 5 tuumaa; 7 tuumaa; Muu
th: เส้นผ่านศูนย์กลางรีลสูงสุดที่รองรับ: 10.5 นิ้ว; 12 นิ้ว; 14 นิ้ว; 5 นิ้ว; 7 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
pl: Maksymalna obsługiwana średnica szpuli: 10,5 cala; 12 cali; 14 cali; 5 cali; 7 cali; Inne
pt-PT: Diâmetro máximo de bobina suportado: 10,5 polegadas; 12 polegadas; 14 polegadas; 5 polegadas; 7 polegadas; Outro
ru: Максимальный поддерживаемый диаметр катушки: 10,5 дюймов; 12 дюймов; 14 дюймов; 5 дюймов; 7 дюймов; Другой
cs: Maximální podporovaný průměr cívky: 10,5 palce; 12 palců; 14 palců; 5 palců; 7 palců; Jiné
sl-SI: Največji podprti premer koluta: 10,5 palca; 12 palcev; 14 palcev; 5 palcev; 7 palcev; Drugo
da: Maksimal understøttet spolediameter: 10,5 tommer; 12 tommer; 14 tommer; 5 tommer; 7 tommer; Andet
nl: Maximum ondersteunde spoeldiameter: 10,5 inch; 12 inch; 14 inch; 5 inch; 7 inch; Andere
zh-TW: 支援的最大捲盤直徑: 10.5 英寸; 12 英寸; 14 英寸; 5 英寸; 7 英寸; 其他
bg-BG: Максимален поддържан диаметър на ролката: 10,5 инча; 12 инча; 14 инча; 5 инча; 7 инча; Други
vi: Đường kính cuộn tối đa được hỗ trợ: 10,5 inch; 12 inch; 14 inch; 5 inch; 7 inch; Khác
pt-BR: Diâmetro máximo de bobina suportado: 10,5 polegadas; 12 polegadas; 14 polegadas; 5 polegadas; 7 polegadas; Outro
nb: Maksimal spolediameter støttet: 10,5 tommer; 12 tommer; 14 tommer; 5 tommer; 7 tommer; Annet
tr: Desteklenen maksimum makara çapı: 10,5 inç; 12 inç; 14 inç; 5 inç; 7 inç; Diğer
ro-RO: Diametru maxim rolă acceptat: 10,5 inchi; 12 inchi; 14 inchi; 5 inchi; 7 inchi; Altele
es: Diámetro máximo de bobina admitido: 10,5 pulgadas; 12 pulgadas; 14 pulgadas; 5 pulgadas; 7 pulgadas; Otros
de: Maximal unterstützter Spulendurchmesser: 10,5 Zoll; 12 Zoll; 14 Zoll; 5 Zoll; 7 Zoll; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Maksimalni podržani promjer koluta: 10,5 inča; 12 inča; 14 inča; 5 inča; 7 inča; Ostalo
zh-CN: 支持的最大卷盘直径: 10.5 英寸; 12 英寸; 14 英寸; 5 英寸; 7 英寸; 其他
lt-LT: Maksimalus palaikomas ritės skersmuo: 10,5 colio; 12 colių; 14 colių; 5 coliai; 7 coliai; Kita
it: Diametro massimo della bobina supportato: 10,5 pollici; 12 pollici; 14 pollici; 5 pollici; 7 pollici; Altro
en: Maximum reel diameter supported: 10.5 inch; 12 inch; 14 inch; 5 inch; 7 inch; Other
ja: サポートされる最大リール径: 10.5 インチ; 12 インチ; 14 インチ; 5 インチ; 7 インチ; その他
sk-SK: Maximálny podporovaný priemer navijaka: 10,5 palca; 12 palcov; 14 palcov; 5 palcov; 7 palcov; Iné
hu: Maximálisan támogatott orsóátmérő: 10,5 hüvelyk; 12 hüvelyk; 14 hüvelyk; 5 hüvelyk; 7 hüvelyk; Egyéb